District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.10

Qualifications for licensure.

(a)

The Board of Professional Counseling shall license as a professional counselor a person who, in addition to meeting the requirements of subchapter V of this chapter, has satisfactorily completed the examination process, has completed 60 hours of postgraduate education in counseling or a related subject from an accredited college or university, and has completed 2 years of supervised counseling experience.

(b)

The Board of Professional Counseling shall license as a graduate professional counselor a person who, in addition to meeting the requirements of subchapter V of this chapter [§3-1205.01 et seq.], has satisfactorily completed the examination process and has completed 48 hours of graduate education leading to a Master’s degree in counseling or a related subject from an accredited college or university.

(c)

The Board of Professional Counseling shall license, by endorsement, a professional counselor who, in addition to meeting the requirements of subchapter V of this chapter [§3-1205.01 et seq.],, is currently licensed in another state and meets the American Association of State Counseling Boards Tier II requirements, which consist of:

(1)

Completion of at least 60 hours of postgraduate education leading to a Master’s degree in counseling or a related field obtained from an institution of higher education that is regionally accredited by an accrediting body recognized by the U.S. Department of Education;

(2)

Supervision by another person, which shall consist of at least 2 years of post-Master’s counseling experience with a minimum of 4,000 hours;

(3)

Having 2,500 hours of direct client contact within the 4,000 hours;

(4)

A minimum of 100 hours of clinical supervision, post-Master’s, of which 50 hours may be in group supervision; and

(5)

Five years of post-licensure experience in clinical counseling at the independent level.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 710
as added July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-126, § 2(g), 39 DCR 3824
July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-13, § 2(d), 56 DCR 3608

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3307.10.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-13 designated subsec. (a); and added subsecs. (b) and (c).